California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) The exemption provided by this section extends only to items that have value as museum pieces and does not extend to display cases, shelving, lamps, lighting fixtures, or other items of tangible personal property utilized in the operation of a museum. However, the exemption does include sprung instant structures used as temporary exhibit housing.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “museum” includes only any of the following:

(1) A museum that has a significant portion of its space open to the public without charge.

(2) A museum open to the public without charge for not less than six hours during any month the museum is open to the public.

(3) A museum that is open to a segment of the student or adult population without charge.

(d) This section applies only to the San Diego Air & Space Museum and the California Science Center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 226.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.5.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, endangered or threatened animal or plant species, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6010.50 if both the seller and the purchaser are nonprofit zoological societies as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6010.50.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 771, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------

6367.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from occasional sales of tangible personal property and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property, the transfer of which to the purchaser is an occasional sale. This exemption does not apply to the gross receipts from the sale of, or to the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be annually registered under the Health and Safety Code, a vessel or aircraft, as
 defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6271) of Chapter 3.5 of this part, or a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code or a vehicle required to be identified under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code. This section shall not preclude the exemption afforded under Section 6281.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.4.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of watercraft and any sales of tangible personal property becoming a component part of that watercraft in the course of constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same, and charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to that constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, if any of the following conditions are met: 

(1) The watercraft is for use in interstate or foreign commerce involving the transportation of property or persons for hire. 

(2) The watercraft is for use in commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters of this state by persons who are regularly engaged in commercial deep sea fishing. 

(3) The watercraft is functionally used 80 percent or more of the time in the transporting for hire of property or persons to vessels or offshore drilling platforms located outside the territorial waters of this state. 

(b) For purposes of this section, it shall be rebuttably presumed that a person is not regularly engaged in the business of commercial deep sea fishing if the person has gross receipts from commercial fishing operations of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) a year. 

(c) For purposes of this section, it shall be rebuttably presumed that the watercraft is not regularly used in interstate or foreign commerce involving the transportation for hire of property or persons, if the yearly gross receipts of the person using that watercraft in the transportation of property or persons do not exceed 10 percent of the cost of that watercraft to him or her, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.5.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.1.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of watercraft which are leased, or are sold to persons for the purpose of leasing, and any sales of tangible personal property becoming a component part of such watercraft in the course of constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same, and charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to such constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, if any of the following
 conditions are met: 

(1) The lessee uses the watercraft in interstate and foreign commerce involving the transportation of property or persons for hire. 

(2) The watercraft is for use in commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters of this state by persons who are regularly engaged in commercial deep sea fishing. 

(3) The lessee functionally uses the watercraft 80 percent or more of the time in the transporting for hire of property or persons to vessels or offshore drilling platforms located outside the territorial waters of this state.

(b) For purposes of this section, it shall be rebuttably presumed that a person is not regularly engaged in the business of commercial deep sea fishing if the person has gross receipts from
 commercial fishing operations of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) a year. 

(c) For purposes of this section, it shall be rebuttably presumed that the watercraft is not regularly used in the business of transporting for hire property or persons, if the yearly gross receipts of the lessor from the lease of that watercraft to persons using that watercraft in the transportation of property or persons do not exceed 10 percent of the cost of that watercraft to the lessor, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.2.

(a) On or after January 1, 2023, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a qualified motor vehicle sold to a qualified buyer.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Qualified motor vehicle” means a vehicle for which a grant letter is awarded to the qualified buyer under the Clean Cars 4 All Program established by Section 44124.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Qualified buyer” means an individual to whom an award letter or other approval
 documentation was issued by any entity implementing the Clean Cars 4 All Program indicating that their application was approved for a grant under the Clean Cars 4 All Program.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051 or 6201 that is
 deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15.

(d) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The specific goal, purpose, and objective that the exemption will achieve is to increase the number of low-income California drivers participating in the Clean Cars 4 All Program and to encourage those drivers to scrap their older, high-polluting car and replace it with a zero- or near-zero emission vehicle.

(2) Detailed performance indicators measure whether the exemption meets the goal, purpose, and objective described in paragraph (1) are the following:

(A) The number of taxpayers exempting the gross receipts from the sale in
 this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a qualified motor vehicle sold to a qualified buyer under the Clean Cars 4 All Program pursuant to this section.

(B) The total dollar amount of moneys exempted under this section.

(C) The total number of qualified buyers in each tax bracket for whom a taxpayer claimed an exemption under this section.

(3) On or before March 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall analyze the performance indicators in paragraph (2) and shall report its findings, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 375, Sec. 5.   (SB 1382)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.5.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this State of rail freight cars for use in interstate or foreign commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.7.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale and the storage, use, or other consumption of passenger transportation vehicles, including, but not limited to, rail passenger cars, locomotives, other rail vehicles, bus and van fleets, and ferryboats, sold or leased to the Department of Transportation by a person who received title to the property from the Department of Transportation pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 14060) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1510, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6368.9.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, qualified equipment purchased by a qualified person at the end of the term of a lease or sublease of qualified equipment pursuant to any exercise of a purchase option under the lease or sublease, provided the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) As of the date the lease or sublease was entered into, the qualified person and qualified equipment were otherwise eligible for exemption under Section 6368.8, as that section read on that same date.

(2) The lease or sublease was entered into before the repeal date of Section 6368.8.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified equipment” and “qualified person” have the same meanings as defined in Section 6368.8, as that section read on the date the lease or sublease was entered into.

(c) This section shall only become operative if Section 6368.8 is repealed and, in that event, shall become operative on the date that section is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 597, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2003.   Adding action operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 597.   Section operative January 1, 2009 (repeal date of Section 6368.8), by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, medicines:

(1) Prescribed for the treatment of a human being by a person authorized to prescribe the medicines, and dispensed on prescription filled by a registered pharmacist in accordance with law.

(2) Furnished by
 a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist to his or her own patient for treatment of the patient.

(3) Furnished by a health facility for treatment of any person pursuant to the order of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist.

(4) Sold to a licensed physician and surgeon, podiatrist, dentist, or health facility for the treatment of a human being.

(5) Sold to this state or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, for use in the treatment of a human being; or furnished for the treatment of a human being by a medical facility or clinic maintained by this state or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof.

(6) Furnished without charge by a pharmaceutical manufacturer or distributor to a
 licensed physician, surgeon, dentist, podiatrist, or health facility for the treatment of a human being, or furnished by a pharmaceutical manufacturer or distributor without charge to an institution of higher education for instruction or research, provided that the exemption provided in this paragraph is limited to medicines of a type that can be dispensed only (A) for the treatment of a human being and (B) pursuant to prescriptions issued by persons authorized to prescribe medicines. The exemption provided in this paragraph shall include the materials used to package, and the constituent elements and ingredients used to produce, the medicines described in this paragraph and is intended to preclude any imposition of tax pursuant to Section 6094 or 6095 with respect to those materials, elements, and ingredients.

(b) “Medicines” as used in this section, means any substance or preparation intended for use by external or internal application to the
 human body in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease and commonly recognized as a substance or preparation intended for that use. However, “medicines” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any auditory, prosthetic, ophthalmic, or ocular device or appliance.

(2) Articles that are in the nature of splints, bandages, pads, compresses, supports, dressings, instruments, apparatus, contrivances, appliances, devices, or other mechanical, electronic, optical, or physical equipment or article or the component parts and accessories thereof.

(3) Any alcoholic beverage the manufacture, sale, purchase, possession, or transportation of which is licensed and regulated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), “medicines” as used in this section means and includes any of the following:

(1) Sutures, whether or not permanently implanted.

(2) Bone screws, bone pins, pacemakers, and other articles, other than dentures, permanently implanted in the human body to assist the functioning of any natural organ, artery, vein, or limb and which remain or dissolve in the body.

(3) (A) Orthotic devices, other than orthodontic devices, designed to be worn on the person of the user as a brace, support, or correction for the body structure, and replacement parts for these devices. However, orthopedic shoes and supportive devices for the foot are not exempt unless they are custom-made biomechanical foot orthoses or are an
 integral part of a leg brace or artificial leg.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “custom-made biomechanical foot orthoses” means an individually prescribed foot orthosis which is custom fabricated over a neutral or near neutral subtalar joint with a pronated midtarsal joint position positive plaster model of the patient’s foot, which model, when the cast is modified to support the osseous position of the forefoot in relationship to the rearfoot, embodies the angular osseous relationships of the anterior and posterior portions of the foot.

(4) Prosthetic devices, and replacement parts for those devices, designed to be worn on or in the person of the user to replace or assist the functioning of a natural part of the human body, other than auditory, ophthalmic, and ocular devices or appliances, and other than dentures, removable or fixed bridges, crowns, caps, inlays, artificial
 teeth, and other dental prosthetic materials and devices.

(5) Artificial limbs and eyes, or their replacement parts, for human beings.

(6) Programmable drug infusion devices to be worn on or implanted in the human body.

(d) “Health facility” as used in this section has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and also includes any “clinic” as defined in Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Insulin and insulin syringes furnished by a registered pharmacist to a person for treatment of diabetes as directed by a physician shall be deemed to be dispensed on prescription within the meaning of this section.

(f) Orthotic and prosthetic devices, and
 replacement parts for these devices, furnished pursuant to the written order of a physician or podiatrist, shall be deemed to be dispensed on prescription within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), whether or not the devices are furnished by a registered pharmacist.

(g) Mammary prostheses, and any appliances and related supplies necessary as the result of any surgical procedure by which an artificial opening is created in the human body for the elimination of natural waste, shall be deemed to be dispensed on prescription within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 2001.   Operative April 1, 2002, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.1.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale, and the storage, use or other consumption, in this state of hemodialysis products supplied to a patient on order of a licensed physician and surgeon pursuant to Section 4050.7 or 4227 of the Business and Professions Code and which constitute medicines as defined in Section 6369.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1336.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.2.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of wheelchairs, crutches, canes, quad canes, white canes used by the legally blind, and walkers, and replacement parts for these devices, when sold to an individual for the personal use of that individual as directed by a physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.4.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale, and the storage, use, or other consumption, in this state of items and materials when used to modify a vehicle for physically handicapped persons.

(b) In the case of the sale of a modified vehicle described in subdivision (a) to a disabled person who is
 eligible to be issued a distinguishing license plate or placard for parking purposes pursuant to Section 22511.5 of the Vehicle Code, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale, and the storage, use, or other consumption attributable to that portion of the vehicle which has been modified for physically handicapped persons.

(c) For purposes of this section, on and after July 1, 2020, and before July 1, 2030, “physically handicapped persons” shall include eligible persons with a severe burn injury, as those terms are defined in Section 3901(1) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   (AB 1257)   Effective September 20, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.5.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale, and the storage, use, or other consumption, in this state of any medical oxygen delivery system, including, but not limited to, liquid oxygen containers, high pressure cylinders, and regulators, when sold, leased, or rented to an individual for the personal use of that individual as directed by a physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1450, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.6.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products as those terms are defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code when a person with an identification card or primary caregiver furnishes the seller with both their card issued under Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code and a valid government-issued identification card.

(b) For purposes of this section, “person with an identification card” and “primary caregiver” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 12.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6369.7.

(a) On and after January 1, 2019, and before January 1, 2025, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, building materials and supplies purchased by a qualified person for use by that qualified person in the construction of a qualified facility.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Building materials and supplies” includes any machinery, equipment, materials, accessories, appliances, contrivances, furniture, fixtures, and all technical equipment
 or other tangible personal property of any other nature or description that meet all of the following:

(i) Are necessary to construct and equip a qualified facility.

(ii) Become part of the completed facility.

(iii) Are transferred to the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a gift described in paragraph (3).

(B) “Building materials and supplies” shall not include any tools or construction equipment other than those specified in subparagraph (A) that a qualified person uses in construction activities, specifically including construction of a qualified facility.

(2) “Qualified facility” means either of the following:

(A) A medical facility, or a temporary residential facility for families of patients receiving care, including either or both inpatient and outpatient care, at a medical facility, located on a United States military base in California.

(B) A United States Department of Veterans Affairs medical center, or a temporary residential facility for families of patients receiving care at or as part of a United States Department of Veterans Affairs medical center, located in California.

(3) “Qualified nonprofit organization” means an organization exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that constructs a qualified facility as a gift
 to the United States Department of Defense pursuant to Section 2601 of Title 10 of the United States Code or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to Section 8301 of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(4) “Qualified person” means either or both of the following:

(A) A qualified nonprofit organization.

(B) A contractor, subcontractor, or builder working under contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to construct a qualified facility.

(c) The exemption provided by this section shall only apply to sales and purchases that occur after the date the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans
 Affairs accepts the offer of the qualified nonprofit organization to construct the qualified facility and on or before the date the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs accepts the qualified facility.

(d) (1) An exemption shall not be allowed under this section with respect to sales by, or purchases from, a retailer engaged in business in this state or from a retailer that is authorized by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, under the rules and regulations as it may prescribe, to collect the tax and that is, for the purposes of this part relating to the use tax, regarded as a retailer engaged in business in this state, unless the purchaser furnishes the retailer with an exemption certificate completed in accordance with any instructions or regulations as the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may prescribe and the retailer retains a copy of the exemption certificate in its records and furnishes the copy of the exemption certificate to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration upon request.

(2) If a purchaser furnishes the retailer with a copy of an exemption certificate pursuant to paragraph (1), but uses building materials and supplies purchased with the exemption certificate in a manner not qualifying for the exemption, the purchaser is liable for payment of sales tax, with applicable interest, as if the purchaser were a retailer making a retail sale of the building materials and supplies at the time the property is so used, and the cost of the building materials and supplies to the purchaser shall be deemed the gross receipts from that retail
 sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 13.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6370.

(a) This section applies to each of the following:

(1) Nonprofit parent-teacher associations chartered by the California Congress of Parents, Teachers, and Students, Incorporated, and equivalent organizations performing the same type of service for public or private schools and authorized to operate within the school by the governing authority of the school.

(2) Nonprofit parent cooperative nursery schools.

(3) Nonprofit associations commonly called The Friends of the Library, and equivalent organizations performing auxiliary services to any library district, municipal library, or county library in the state, which are authorized to operate within the library by the governing authority of the library.

(b) An organization described in subdivision (a) is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to, tangible personal property which it sells, if the profits are used exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the organization.

(c) This section shall not be applicable to the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1213, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1987.   Operative January 1, 1988, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

6370.2.

(a) On and after April 1, 2024, and before April 1, 2029, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, all of the following:

(1) Breast pumps.

(2) Breast pump collection and storage supplies.

(3) Breast pump kits.

(4) Breast pads.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall
 apply:

(1) (A) “Breast pump” means an electrically or manually controlled pump device designed and marketed to be used to express milk from a human breast during lactation.

(B) “Breast pump” includes the electrically or manually controlled pump device and any battery, alternating current (AC) adapter, or other power supply unit packaged and sold with the pump device at the time of sale to power the pump device.

(2) (A) “Breast pump collection and storage supplies” means tangible personal property designed or marketed to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect milk expressed from a human breast and store collected milk until it is ready for consumption, including,
 but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Breast shields and breast shield connectors.

(ii) Breast pump tubes and tubing adapters.

(iii) Breast pump valves and membranes.

(iv) Backflow protectors and backflow protector adaptors.

(v) Bottle and bottle caps specific to the operation of the breast pump.

(vi) Breast milk storage bags.

(vii) Other items that may be useful to initiate, support, or sustain breastfeeding using a breast pump during lactation, that may be sold separately,
 but are generally sold as part of a breast pump kit.

(B) “Breast pump collection and storage supplies” does not include the following items if not sold as part of a breast pump kit prepackaged by the breast pump manufacturer or distributor:

(i) Bottles and bottle caps not specific to the operation of the breast pump.

(ii) Breast pump travel bags and other similar carrying accessories, including ice packs, labels, and other similar products.

(iii) Breast pump cleaning supplies.

(iv) Nursing bras, bra pads, breast shells, and other similar products.

(v) Creams, ointments, and other similar products that relieve breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the breasts or nipples.

(3) “Breast pump kit” means a kit that contains a breast pump and one or more of the following items:

(A) Breast pump collection and storage supplies.

(B) Other tangible personal property that may be useful to initiate, support, or sustain breastfeeding using a breast pump during lactation, so long as the other tangible personal property sold with the breast pump kit at the time of the sale are less than 10 percent of the total sales price of the breast pump kit.

(c) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the
 Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The specific goals, purposes, and objectives of this act are:

(A) To promote public health by increasing the affordability of, and expanding access to, breast pumps and related supplies.

(B) To ease the financial burden placed on families who rely on breast pumps to feed their children.

(C) To create parity in taxation between formula and breast pump equipment.

(D) To incentivize optimal breastfeeding for the entirety of time recommended by experts.

(2) (A) To measure the
 goals set forth in paragraph (1), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall review the effectiveness of the exemption and may request information for this purpose from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and any other relevant state government entity.

(B) On or before July 1, 2027, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, of the review completed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Governance and Finance Committee. The report shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(i) A recommendation on whether the exemption should be modified,
 extended, or allowed to become inoperative.

(ii) An assessment on whether more targeted approaches to providing families in need with adequate access to breast pumps and related supplies are available. 

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until April 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   (AB 1203)   Effective October 13, 2023.   Repealed as of April 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6370.5.

(a) This section applies to nonprofit associations and equivalent organizations performing auxiliary services to any city or county museum in the state, which are authorized to operate within the museum by the governing authority of the museum and have held an annual rummage sale for at least five consecutive years immediately preceding the sale referred to in subdivision (b).

(b) An organization described in subdivision (a) is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with
 respect to, tangible personal property which it sells at an annual rummage sale; provided, the profits are used exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the organization.

(c) This section shall not be applicable to the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1168, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6371.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption of, medical identification tags furnished by an organization which is exempted from taxes under Section 23701.

(b) For purposes of this section, “medical identification tags” includes any tag worn by a person for the purpose of alerting other persons that the wearer of the tag has a medical disability or allergic reaction to certain
 treatments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6372.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption of, a digital product purchased solely for use outside of this state or in interstate or foreign commerce.

(b) (1) The burden of proving that the exemption created by this section applies is on the seller who makes the sale of a digital product, unless the seller takes from the purchaser a certificate to the effect that the property is purchased solely for use outside of this state or in interstate or foreign commerce in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

(2) The certificate described by this subdivision
 relieves the person selling the digital product from the duty of paying sales tax and collecting the use tax only if taken in good faith.

(c) If a purchaser certifies in writing to a seller that a purchase of a digital product is exempted by this section and uses the digital product in this state, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of sales tax as if the purchaser were a retailer making a retail sale of the property at the time of that use, and the cost of the property to the purchaser shall be deemed the gross receipts from that retail sale.

(d) (1) A purchaser that purchases a digital product for use in this state and a digital product solely for use outside of this state or in interstate or foreign commerce in the same transaction may issue an exemption certificate under this section for the purchase of any of those digital products eligible for the
 exemption and report and pay use tax on any of those digital products used in this state.

(2) A purchaser that issues an exemption certificate described in paragraph (1) shall report and pay use tax in a manner that reflects the use tax due on any of those digital products used in this state.

(e) (1) The department may set forth, authorize, or require alternative methods to calculate the sales or use tax due in this state that fairly reflects the sales or use tax due on any digital product sold or purchased for use in this state, including on licenses of digital products concurrently available for use in multiple locations.

(2) If an alternative method set forth, authorized, or required by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) is used to calculate the sales or use tax due, Section 6406 shall
 not apply.

(3) The department may prescribe any forms or exemption certificates, as necessary to administer this subdivision.

(f) The exemption created by this section does not apply to a sale or purchase of a digital product transferred on tangible storage media.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 16.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6372.1.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption of, a digital product that represents a service provided in electronic form in which both of the following apply:

(1) The service primarily involves the application of human effort by the service provider.

(2) The human effort described in paragraph (1) originated after the customer requested the service.

(b) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to the sale or purchase of the right to use the provider’s computer software running on a cloud infrastructure or the
 right to access that software from various client devices through either a thin client interface, including a web browser, or a program interface.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 17.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6373.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property the gross receipts of which are received in the form of CalFresh benefits acquired by the purchaser pursuant to the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) of Title 7 of the United States Code), including subsequent amendments thereto.

(b) When the gross receipts from a sale of tangible personal property are received partly in the form of cash and partly in the form of CalFresh benefits, the amount of the CalFresh benefits shall be attributed first to gross receipts which would have been subject to the taxes imposed by this part if payment were not received in the form of CalFresh benefits.

(c) A retailer shall not add to the sale price of tangible personal property any amount designated as sales tax, use tax, or sales tax reimbursement when the sale is exempt pursuant to this section.

(d) In lieu of separately accounting for gross receipts which are exempt pursuant to this section and taking a deduction on sales tax returns for the exact amount of those gross receipts, the board may provide, for the efficient administration of this part, an
 alternative method that retailers may use to compute the allowable deduction for the total amount of CalFresh benefits redeemed during the period for which the return is filed, provided that method results in a deduction the amount of which is at least equal to 2 percent of the total amount of CalFresh benefits redeemed.

(e) This section is repealed on the first day of the first calendar month immediately following the effective date of any federal act which repeals those provisions which prohibit the state from participating in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program if sales taxes are imposed within the state on purchases made with CalFresh benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 17.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6374.
